New York, session 2025-2026, A8165.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 77-k to read as follows: 3 § 77-k. Sports field fence leases in the city of White Plains, West- 4 chester county. Notwithstanding any provision of any general, special 5 or local law or of any charter to the contrary, the city of White 6 Plains, Westchester county, may lease any and all sports field fences at 7 Gedney Field, annually, at a nominal rent, to a not-for-profit 8 corporation or organization, organized under the laws of the state of 9 New York for the purpose of permitting the sale of advertising, with the 10 revenues to be used solely for the care of such field in the city of 11 White Plains, Westchester county. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11815-01-5